North Carolina statutes. Chapter 7A. Judicial Department.
Article 38A. Appellate Defender Office. [Repealed]

§§ 7A-486 through 7A-486.7.
[Repealed]

Repealed by Session Laws 2000-144, s. 13, as amended by Session Laws 2001-424, s. 22.11(c), effective July 1, 2001.

Cross References.

For current provisions regarding Appellate Defender, see

G.S. 7A-498.8

.

§§ 7A-487,
7A-488.

Reserved for future codification purposes.